Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-275
Petition, complaint, or restorative justice program consent form; filing; time.

Whenever a juvenile is detained or placed in custody under the provisions of section 43-253, a petition, complaint, or restorative justice program consent form must be filed within forty-eight hours excluding nonjudicial days.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 31;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 21;

Laws 2019, LB595, § 29.

Failure to file a petition within forty-eight hours, as provided in this section, after a juvenile has been taken into custody pursuant to section 43-248 does not deprive the juvenile court of jurisdiction. In re Interest of S.S.L., 219 Neb. 911, 367 N.W.2d 710 (1985).